Utah statutes.
63H-1-702.   Amending the authority annual budget.

(1)  The authority board may by resolution amend an annual authority budget.

(2)  An amendment of the annual authority budget that would increase the total expenditures may be made only after public hearing by notice published as required for initial adoption of the annual budget.

(3)  The authority may not make expenditures in excess of the total expenditures established in the annual budget as it is adopted or amended.



Enacted by Chapter 23, 2007 General Session

